District of Columbia statutes.
32-413

Mediation or arbitration of disputes.

Upon receipt of a complaint against an employment agency, employment counseling service, employer-paid personnel service, job listing service, or employment counselor, the Mayor may seek to mediate the dispute or arrange for arbitration by an impartial arbitrator or panel of arbitrators.

Mar. 13, 1985, D.C. Law 5-136, § 14, 31 DCR 5727
1981 Ed., § 36-1013.